Florida, session 2026, SB74.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 127 128 Section 1.âSection 491.022, Florida Statutes, is created to 129 read: 130 491.022âSocial Work Licensure Interstate Compact.âThe 131 Social Work Licensure Interstate Compact is hereby enacted into 132 law and entered into by this state with all other states legally 133 joining therein in the form substantially as follows: 134 135 ARTICLE I 136 PURPOSE 137 138 (1)âThe purpose of the compact is to facilitate interstate 139 practice of regulated social workers by improving public access 140 to competent social work services. 141 (2)âThe compact preserves the regulatory authority of 142 member states to protect public health and safety through the 143 current system of state licensure. The compact is designed to 144 achieve all of the following objectives: 145 (a)âIncrease public access to social work services. 146 (b)âReduce overly burdensome and duplicative requirements 147 associated with holding multiple licenses. 148 (c)âEnhance member statesâ ability to protect the publicâs 149 health and safety. 150 (d)âEncourage the cooperation of member states in 151 regulating multistate practice of regulated social workers. 152 (e)âPromote mobility and address workforce shortages by 153 eliminating the necessity for licenses in multiple states by 154 providing for the mutual recognition of other member state 155 licenses. 156 (f)âSupport military families. 157 (g)âFacilitate the exchange of licensure and disciplinary 158 information among member states. 159 (h)âAuthorize all member states to hold a regulated social 160 worker accountable for abiding by the laws, regulations, and 161 applicable professional standards in the member state in which 162 the client is located at the time care is rendered. 163 (i)âAllow for the use of telehealth to facilitate increased 164 access to social work services. 165 166 ARTICLE II 167 DEFINITIONS 168 169 As used in the compact, the term: 170 (1)ââActive military memberâ means any individual on full 171 time duty status in the active Armed Forces of the United 172 States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve. 173 (2)ââAdverse actionâ means any administrative, civil, 174 equitable, or criminal action authorized by a stateâs laws which 175 is imposed by a licensing authority or other authority against a 176 regulated social worker, including actions against an 177 individualâs license or multistate authorization to practice, 178 such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the 179 licensee, limitation on the licenseeâs practice, or any other 180 encumbrance on licensure affecting a regulated social workerâs 181 authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and 182 desist action. 183 (3)ââAlternative programâ means a nondisciplinary 184 monitoring or practice remediation process approved by a 185 licensing authority to address practitioners with an impairment. 186 (4)ââCharter member stateâ means a member state that 187 enacted legislation to adopt the compact where such legislation 188 predates the effective date of the compact as described in 189 Article XIV. 190 (5)ââCommissionâ means the government agency whose 191 membership consists of all states that have enacted the compact, 192 which is known as the Social Work Licensure Compact Commission, 193 as described in Article X, and which shall operate as an 194 instrumentality of the member states. 195 (6)ââCurrent significant investigative informationâ means: 196 (a)âInvestigative information that a licensing authority, 197 after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an 198 opportunity for the regulated social worker to respond, has 199 reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would 200 indicate more than a minor infraction as may be defined by the 201 commission; or 202 (b)âInvestigative information that indicates that the 203 regulated social worker represents an immediate threat to public 204 health and safety, as defined by the commission, regardless of 205 whether the regulated social worker has been notified and has 206 had an opportunity to respond. 207 (7)ââData systemâ means a repository of information about 208 licensees, including, but not limited to, continuing education, 209 examination records, licensure status, current significant 210 investigative information, disqualifying events, multistate 211 licenses, adverse action information, and any other information 212 required by the commission. 213 (8)ââDisqualifying eventâ means any adverse action or 214 incident that results in an encumbrance that disqualifies or 215 makes the licensee ineligible to obtain, retain, or renew a 216 multistate license. 217 (9)ââDomicileâ means the jurisdiction in which a licensee 218 resides and intends to remain indefinitely. 219 (10)ââEncumbranceâ means a revocation or suspension of, or 220 any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of social 221 work as licensed and regulated by a licensing authority. 222 (11)ââExecutive committeeâ means a group of delegates 223 elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers 224 granted to them by, the compact and commission. 225 (12)ââHome stateâ means the member state that is a 226 licenseeâs primary domicile. 227 (13)ââImpairmentâ means a condition that may impair a 228 practitionerâs ability to engage in full and unrestricted 229 practice as a regulated social worker without some type of 230 intervention and may include, but is not limited to, alcohol and 231 drug dependence, a mental health impairment, or a neurological 232 or physical impairment. 233 (14)ââLicenseeâ means an individual who currently holds a 234 license from a state to practice as a regulated social worker. 235 (15)ââLicensing authorityâ means the board or agency of a 236 member state, or an equivalent, which is responsible for the 237 licensing and regulation of regulated social workers. 238 (16)ââMember stateâ means a state, commonwealth, district, 239 or territory of the United States which has enacted the compact. 240 (17)ââMultistate authorization to practiceâ means a legally 241 authorized privilege to practice which is equivalent to a 242 license associated with a multistate license authorizing the 243 practice of social work in a remote state. 244 (18)ââMultistate licenseâ means a license to practice as a 245 regulated social worker issued by a home stateâs licensing 246 authority which authorizes the regulated social worker to 247 practice in all member states under the multistate authorization 248 to practice. 249 (19)ââQualifying national examâ means a national licensing 250 examination approved by the commission. 251 (20)ââRegulated social workerâ means any clinical, 252 masterâs, or bachelorâs social worker licensed by a member state 253 regardless of the title used by that member state. 254 (21)ââRemote stateâ means a member state other than the 255 licenseeâs home state. 256 (22)ââRuleâ means a regulation adopted by the commission, 257 as authorized by the compact, which regulation has the force of 258 law. 259 (23)ââSingle-state licenseâ means a license to practice 260 social work issued by any state which authorizes practice only 261 within the issuing state. The term does not include a multistate 262 authorization to practice in any member state. 263 (24)ââSocial workâ or âsocial work servicesâ means the 264 application of social work theory, knowledge, methods, and 265 ethics and the professional use of self to restore or enhance 266 social, psychosocial, or biopsychosocial functioning of 267 individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations, and 268 communities through the care and services provided by a 269 regulated social worker as provided in the member stateâs 270 statutes and regulations in the state where the services are 271 being provided. 272 (25)ââStateâ means any state, commonwealth, district, or 273 territory of the United States which regulates the practice of 274 social work. 275 (26)ââUnencumbered licenseâ means a license that authorizes 276 a regulated social worker to engage in the full and unrestricted 277 practice of social work. 278 279 ARTICLE III 280 STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT 281 282 (1)âTo be eligible to participate in the compact, a 283 potential member state must meet all of the following criteria 284 at the time of joining the compact: 285 (a)âLicense and regulate the practice of social work at the 286 clinical, masterâs, or bachelorâs level. 287 (b)âRequire applicants for licensure to graduate from a 288 program that: 289 1.âIs operated by a college or university recognized by the 290 stateâs licensing authority; 291 2.âIs accredited, or in candidacy by an institution that 292 subsequently becomes accredited, by an accrediting agency 293 recognized by either: 294 a.âThe Council for Higher Education Accreditation, or its 295 successor; or 296 b.âThe United States Department of Education; and 297 3.âCorresponds to the corresponding category of multistate 298 license sought, as outlined in Article IV. 299 (c)âRequire applicants for clinical licensure to complete a 300 period of supervised practice. 301 (d)âHave a mechanism in place for receiving, investigating, 302 and adjudicating complaints about licensees. 303 (2)âTo maintain membership in the compact, a member state 304 must: 305 (a)âRequire applicants for a multistate license to pass a 306 qualifying national exam for the corresponding category of 307 multistate license sought, as outlined in Article IV; 308 (b)âParticipate fully in the commissionâs data system, 309 including using the commissionâs unique identifier as defined by 310 commission rule; 311 (c)âNotify the commission, in compliance with the terms of 312 the compact and rules, of any adverse action or the availability 313 of current significant investigative information regarding a 314 licensee; 315 (d)âImplement procedures for considering the criminal 316 history records of applicants for a multistate license. Such 317 procedures must include the submission of fingerprints or other 318 biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of 319 obtaining an applicantâs criminal history record information 320 from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency 321 responsible for retaining that stateâs criminal records; 322 (e)âComply with the rules of the commission; 323 (f)âRequire an applicant to obtain or retain a license in 324 the home state and meet the home stateâs qualifications for 325 licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as all other 326 applicable home state laws; 327 (g)âAuthorize a licensee holding a multistate license in 328 any member state to practice in accordance with the terms of the 329 compact and rules of the commission; and 330 (h)âDesignate a delegate to participate in commission 331 meetings. 332 (3)âA member state meeting the requirements under 333 subsections (1) and (2) shall designate the categories of social 334 work licensure which are eligible for issuance of a multistate 335 license for applicants in such member state. To the extent that 336 any member state does not meet the requirements for 337 participation in the compact for any category of social work 338 licensure, such member state may, but is not obligated to, issue 339 a multistate license to applicants who otherwise meet the 340 requirements of Article IV for issuance of a multistate license 341 in such category or categories of licensure. 342 343 ARTICLE IV 344 SOCIAL WORKER PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT 345 346 (1)âTo be eligible for a multistate license under the 347 compact, an applicant must, regardless of license category, meet 348 all of the following criteria: 349 (a)âHold or be eligible for an active, unencumbered license 350 in the home state. 351 (b)âSubmit, in connection with an application for a 352 multistate license, fingerprints or other biometric-based data 353 for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information 354 from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency 355 responsible for retaining that stateâs criminal records. 356 (c)âNotify the home state of any adverse action, 357 encumbrance, or restriction on any professional license taken by 358 any member state or nonmember state within 30 days after the 359 date the action is taken. 360 (d)âMeet any continuing competency requirements established 361 by the home state. 362 (e)âAbide by the laws, regulations, and applicable 363 standards in the member state where the client is located at the 364 time care is rendered. 365 (2)âAn applicant for a clinical-category multistate license 366 must meet all of the following requirements: 367 (a)âFulfill a competency requirement, which may be 368 satisfied by any of the following: 369 1.âPassage of a clinical-category qualifying national exam; 370 2.âFor an applicant licensed before a qualifying national 371 exam was required by the home state in the clinical category, 372 licensure of the applicant in his or her home state in the 373 clinical category, accompanied by a period of continuous social 374 work licensure thereafter, all of which may be further governed 375 by the rules of the commission; or 376 3.âThe substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency 377 requirements which the commission may determine by rule. 378 (b)âAttain at least a masterâs degree in social work from a 379 program that is: 380 1.âOperated by a college or university recognized by the 381 home stateâs licensing authority; and 382 2.âAccredited, or in candidacy by an institution that 383 subsequently receives accreditation, by an accrediting agency 384 recognized by either: 385 a.âThe Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its 386 successor; or 387 b.âThe United States Department of Education. 388 (c)âFulfill a practice requirement, which may be satisfied 389 by demonstrating completion of any of the following: 390 1.âA period of postgraduate supervised clinical practice 391 equal to a minimum of 3,000 hours; 392 2.âA minimum of 2 years of full-time postgraduate 393 supervised clinical practice; or 394 3.âThe substantial equivalency of the foregoing practice 395 requirements which the commission may determine by rule. 396 (3)âAn applicant for a masterâs-category multistate license 397 must meet all of the following requirements: 398 (a)âFulfill a competency requirement, which may be 399 satisfied by any of the following: 400 1.âPassage of a masterâs-category qualifying national exam; 401 2.âFor an applicant licensed before a qualifying national 402 exam was required by the home state in the masterâs category, 403 licensure of the applicant in his or her home state in the 404 masterâs category, accompanied by a continuous period of social 405 work licensure thereafter, all of which may be further governed 406 by the rules of the commission; or 407 3.âThe substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency 408 requirements which the commission may determine by rule. 409 (b)âAttain at least a masterâs degree in social work from a 410 program that is: 411 1.âOperated by a college or university recognized by the 412 home stateâs licensing authority; and 413 2.âAccredited, or in candidacy by an institution that 414 subsequently becomes accredited, by an accrediting agency 415 recognized by either: 416 a.âThe Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its 417 successor; or 418 b.âThe United States Department of Education. 419 (4)âAn applicant for a bachelorâs-category multistate 420 license must meet all of the following requirements: 421 (a)âFulfill a competency requirement, which may be 422 satisfied by: 423 1.âPassage of a bachelorâs-category qualifying national 424 exam; 425 2.âFor an applicant licensed before a qualifying national 426 exam was required by the home state in the bachelorâs category, 427 licensure of the applicant in his or her home state at the 428 bachelorâs category, accompanied by a period of continuous 429 social work licensure thereafter, all of which may be further 430 governed by the rules of the commission; or 431 3.âThe substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency 432 requirements which the commission may determine by rule. 433 (b)âAttain at least a bachelorâs degree in social work from 434 a program that is: 435 1.âOperated by a college or university recognized by the 436 home stateâs licensing authority; and 437 2.âAccredited, or in candidacy by an institution that 438 subsequently becomes accredited, by an accrediting agency 439 recognized by either: 440 a.âThe Council for Higher Education Accreditation or its 441 successor; or 442 b.âThe United States Department of Education. 443 (5)âThe multistate license for a regulated social worker is 444 subject to the renewal requirements of the home state. The 445 regulated social worker must maintain compliance with the 446 requirements of subsection (1) to be eligible to renew a 447 multistate license. 448 (6)âThe regulated social workerâs services in a remote 449 state are subject to that remote member stateâs regulatory 450 authority. A remote state may, in accordance with due process 451 and that remote member stateâs laws, remove a regulated social 452 workerâs multistate authorization to practice in the remote 453 state for a specific period of time, impose fines, and take any 454 other necessary actions to protect the health and safety of its 455 citizens. 456 (7)âIf a multistate license is encumbered, the regulated 457 social workerâs multistate authorization to practice must be 458 deactivated in all remote states until the multistate license is 459 no longer encumbered. 460 (8)âIf a multistate authorization to practice is encumbered 461 in a remote state, the regulated social workerâs multistate 462 authorization to practice may be deactivated in that state until 463 the multistate authorization to practice is no longer 464 encumbered. 465 466 ARTICLE V 467 ISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE 468 469 (1)âUpon receipt of an application for a multistate 470 license, the home stateâs licensing authority shall determine 471 the applicantâs eligibility for a multistate license in 472 accordance with Article IV. 473 (2)âIf the applicant is eligible under Article IV, the home 474 stateâs licensing authority must issue a multistate license that 475 authorizes the applicant or regulated social worker to practice 476 in all member states under a multistate authorization to 477 practice. 478 (3)âUpon issuance of a multistate license, the home stateâs 479 licensing authority shall designate whether the regulated social 480 worker holds a multistate license at the bachelorâs, masterâs, 481 or clinical category of social work. 482 (4)âA multistate license issued by a home state to a 483 resident in that state must be recognized by all compact member 484 states as authorizing social work practice under a multistate 485 authorization to practice corresponding to each category of 486 licensure regulated in each member state. 487 488 ARTICLE VI 489 AUTHORITY OF THE SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION AND 490 MEMBER STATE LICENSING AUTHORITIES 491 492 (1)âThe compact and rules of the commission do not limit, 493 restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a member state to: 494 (a)âEnact and enforce laws, regulations, or other rules 495 related to the practice of social work in that state, provided 496 those laws, regulations, or other rules do not conflict with the 497 provisions of the compact. 498 (b)âTake adverse action against a licenseeâs single-state 499 license to practice social work in that state. 500 (c)âTake adverse action against a licenseeâs multistate 501 authorization to practice social work in that state. 502 (2)âThe compact and rules of the commission do not limit, 503 restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a licenseeâs home 504 state to take adverse action against a licenseeâs multistate 505 license based upon information provided by a remote state. 506 (3)âThe compact does not affect the requirements 507 established by a member state for the issuance of a single-state 508 license. 509 510 ARTICLE VII 511 REISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE BY A NEW HOME STATE 512 513 (1)âA licensee may hold a multistate license, issued by his 514 or her home state, in only one member state at any given time. 515 (2)âIf a licensee changes his or her home state by moving 516 between two member states, the following requirements apply: 517 (a)âThe licensee must immediately apply for the reissuance 518 of the multistate license in the new home state. The licensee 519 shall notify the former home state in accordance with the rules 520 of the commission. 521 (b)âUpon receipt of an application to reissue a multistate 522 license, the new home state must verify that the multistate 523 license is active, unencumbered, and eligible for reissuance 524 under the terms of the compact and the rules of the commission. 525 The multistate license issued by the former home state must be 526 deactivated and all member states notified in accordance with 527 the applicable rules adopted by the commission. 528 (c)âBefore reissuing the multistate license, the new home 529 state must conduct procedures for considering the criminal 530 history records of the licensee. Such procedures must include 531 the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based 532 information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an 533 applicantâs criminal history record information from the Federal 534 Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining 535 that stateâs criminal records. 536 (d)âIf required for initial licensure, the new home state 537 may require completion of jurisprudence requirements in the new 538 home state. 539 (e)âNotwithstanding any other provision of the compact, if 540 a licensee does not meet the requirements set forth in the 541 compact for the reissuance of a multistate license by the new 542 home state, the licensee is subject to the new home state 543 requirements for the issuance of a single-state license in that 544 state. 545 (3)âIf a licensee changes his or her domicile by moving 546 from a member state to a nonmember state, or from a nonmember 547 state to a member state, the licensee is subject to the stateâs 548 requirements for the issuance of a single-state license in the 549 new home state. 550 (4)âThe compact does not interfere with a licenseeâs 551 ability to hold a single-state license in multiple states; 552 however, for the purposes of the compact, a licensee may have 553 only one home state and only one multistate license. 554 (5)âThe compact does not interfere with the requirements 555 established by a member state for the issuance of a single-state 556 license. 557 558 ARTICLE VIII 559 MILITARY FAMILIES 560 561 An active military member or his or her spouse shall 562 designate a home state as the state in which the individual 563 holds a multistate license. The individual may retain the home 564 state designation during the period the servicemember is on 565 active duty. 566 567 ARTICLE IX 568 ADVERSE ACTIONS 569 570 (1)âIn addition to the other powers conferred by general 571 law, a remote state has the authority, in accordance with 572 existing state due process law, to: 573 (a)âTake adverse action against a regulated social workerâs 574 multistate authorization to practice, but only within that 575 member state, and to issue subpoenas for both hearings and 576 investigations that require the attendance and testimony of 577 witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas 578 issued by a licensing authority in a member state for the 579 attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of 580 evidence from another member state must be enforced in the 581 latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according 582 to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to 583 subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing 584 licensing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, 585 mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the 586 state in which the witnesses or evidence is located. 587 (b)âOnly the home state may take adverse action against a 588 regulated social workerâs multistate license. 589 (2)âFor purposes of taking adverse action, the home state 590 must give the same priority and effect to reported conduct 591 received from a member state as it would if the conduct had 592 occurred within the home state. In so doing, the home state 593 shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action. 594 (3)âThe home state shall complete any pending 595 investigations of a regulated social worker who changes his or 596 her home state during the course of the investigation. The home 597 state also may take appropriate action and shall promptly report 598 the conclusions of the investigations to the administrator of 599 the data system. The administrator of the data system shall 600 promptly notify the new home state of any adverse action. 601 (4)âA member state may, if otherwise authorized by state 602 law, recover from the affected regulated social worker the costs 603 of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any 604 adverse action taken against that regulated social worker. 605 (5)âA member state may take adverse action based on the 606 factual findings of another member state, provided that the 607 member state follows its own procedures for taking the adverse 608 action. 609 (6)(a)âIn addition to the authority granted to a member 610 state by its respective social work practice act or other 611 applicable state law, any member state may participate with 612 other member states in joint investigations of licensees. 613 (b)âMember states shall share any investigative, 614 litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint 615 or individual investigation initiated under the compact. 616 (7)âIf adverse action is taken by the home state against 617 the multistate license of a regulated social worker, the 618 regulated social workerâs multistate authorization to practice 619 in all other member states must be deactivated until all 620 encumbrances have been removed from the multistate license. All 621 home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action 622 against the license of a regulated social worker must include a 623 statement that the regulated social workerâs multistate 624 authorization to practice is deactivated in all member states 625 until all conditions of the decision, order, or agreement are 626 satisfied. 627 (8)âIf a member state takes adverse action, it must 628 promptly notify the administrator of the data system. The 629 administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the home 630 state and all other member states of any adverse actions taken 631 by remote states. 632 (9)âThe compact does not override a member stateâs decision 633 that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu 634 of adverse action. 635 (10)âThe compact does not authorize a member state to 636 demand the issuance of subpoenas for attendance and testimony of 637 witnesses or the production of evidence from another member 638 state for lawful actions within that member state. 639 (11)âThe compact does not authorize a member state to 640 impose discipline against a regulated social worker who holds a 641 multistate authorization to practice for actions committed in 642 another member state which were lawful in that state. 643 644 ARTICLE X 645 ESTABLISHMENT OF SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION 646 647 (1)âThe compact member states hereby create and establish a 648 joint government agency whose membership consists of all member 649 states that have enacted the compact, to be known as the Social 650 Work Licensure Compact Commission. The commission is an 651 instrumentality of the compact member states acting jointly and 652 not an instrumentality of any one state. The commission shall 653 come into existence on or after the effective date of the 654 compact as set forth in Article XIV. 655 (2)(a)âEach member state is entitled to one delegate 656 appointed by that member stateâs licensing authority. The 657 delegate must be one of the following: 658 1.âA current member of the stateâs licensing authority who 659 at the time of appointment is a regulated social worker or 660 public member of the stateâs licensing authority; or 661 2.âAn administrator of the stateâs licensing authority or 662 his or her designee. 663 (b)âThe commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term 664 of office for delegates and may by rule or bylaw establish term 665 limits. 666 (c)âThe commission may recommend removal or suspension of 667 any delegate from office. 668 (d)âA member stateâs licensing authority shall fill any 669 vacancy of its delegate on the commission within 60 days after 670 the vacancy occurs. 671 (e)âEach delegate is entitled to one vote on all matters 672 before the commission requiring a vote by commission delegates. 673 (f)âA delegate must vote in person or by such other means 674 as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates 675 to meet by telecommunication, video conference, or other similar 676 electronic means of communication. 677 (g)âThe commission shall meet at least once during each 678 calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in 679 the bylaws. The commission may meet by telecommunication, video 680 conference, or other similar electronic means of communication. 681 (3)âThe commission may do all of the following: 682 (a)âEstablish the fiscal year of the commission. 683 (b)âEstablish code of conduct and conflict of interest 684 policies. 685 (c)âEstablish and amend rules and bylaws. 686 (d)âMaintain its financial records in accordance with the 687 bylaws. 688 (e)âMeet and take such actions as are consistent with the 689 provisions of the compact, the commissionâs rules, and the 690 bylaws. 691 (f)âInitiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in 692 the name of the commission, provided that the standing of any 693 stateâs licensing authority to sue or be sued under applicable 694 law is not affected. 695 (g)âMaintain and certify records and information provided 696 to a member state as the authenticated business records of the 697 commission, or designate an agent to do so on the commissionâs 698 behalf. 699 (h)âPurchase and maintain insurance and bonds. 700 (i)âBorrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, 701 including, but not limited to, employees of a member state. 702 (j)âConduct an annual financial review. 703 (k)âHire employees and elect or appoint officers; fix 704 compensation for and define duties of such individuals and grant 705 them appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the 706 compact; and establish the commissionâs personnel policies and 707 programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of 708 personnel, and other related personnel matters. 709 (l)âAssess and collect fees. 710 (m)âAccept, receive, use, and dispose of any appropriate 711 gifts, donations, grants of money, other revenue sources, 712 equipment, supplies, materials, and services, provided that at 713 all times the commission avoids any appearance of impropriety or 714 conflict of interest. 715 (n)âLease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any 716 property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest 717 therein. 718 (o)âSell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, 719 abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, 720 or mixed. 721 (p)âEstablish a budget and make expenditures. 722 (q)âBorrow money. 723 (r)âAppoint committees, including standing committees, 724 composed of members, state regulators, state legislators or 725 their representatives, consumer representatives, and such other 726 interested persons as may be designated in the compact and the 727 bylaws. 728 (s)âProvide and receive information from, and cooperate 729 with, law enforcement agencies. 730 (t)âEstablish and elect an executive committee, including a 731 chair and a vice chair. 732 (u)âDetermine whether a stateâs statutorily adopted compact 733 language is materially different from the model compact language 734 such that the state would not qualify for participation in the 735 compact. 736 (v)âPerform any other functions necessary to achieve the 737 purposes of the compact. 738 (4)(a)âThe executive committee shall have the power to act 739 on behalf of the commission according to the terms of the 740 compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the 741 executive committee include all of the following: 742 1.âOverseeing the day-to-day activities of administration 743 of the compact, including enforcement and compliance with the 744 compact and its rules and bylaws and other such duties as deemed 745 necessary by the commission. 746 2.âRecommending to the commission changes to the rules or 747 bylaws, changes to the compact legislation, and fees charged to 748 member states, fees charged to licensees, and other fees. 749 3.âEnsuring compact administration services are 750 appropriately provided, including by contract. 751 4.âPreparing and recommending the budget. 752 5.âMaintaining financial records on behalf of the 753 commission. 754 6.âMonitoring compact compliance of member states and 755 providing compliance reports to the commission. 756 7.âEstablishing additional committees as necessary. 757 8.âExercising the powers and duties of the commission in 758 the interim between commission meetings, except for adopting or 759 amending rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any 760 other powers and duties expressly reserved to the commission by 761 rule or bylaw. 762 9.âPerforming other duties as provided in the rules or 763 bylaws of the commission. 764 (b)âThe executive committee may be composed of up to 11 765 members, as follows: 766 1.âA chair and a vice chair, who must be voting members of 767 the executive committee. 768 2.âFive voting members, selected by the commission from the 769 current membership of the commission. 770 3.âUp to four ex officio, nonvoting members from four 771 recognized national social work organizations specified by the 772 commission, selected by their respective organizations. 773 (c)âThe commission may remove any member of the executive 774 committee as provided in the commissionâs bylaws. 775 (d)âThe executive committee shall meet at least annually. 776 1.âExecutive committee meetings must be open to the public, 777 except that the executive committee may meet in a closed, 778 nonpublic meeting as provided in subsection (7). 779 2.âThe executive committee shall give 7 daysâ notice of its 780 meetings, posted on its website and as determined by the 781 commission, to provide notice to persons with an interest in the 782 business of the commission. 783 3.âThe executive committee may hold a special meeting in 784 accordance with subsection (6). 785 (5)âThe commission shall adopt and provide to the member 786 states an annual report. 787 (6)âAll meetings of the commission must be open to the 788 public, except that the commission may meet in a closed, 789 nonpublic meeting as provided in subsection (7). 790 (a)âPublic notice for all meetings of the full commission 791 must be given in the same manner as required under the 792 rulemaking provisions in Article XII, except that the commission 793 may hold a special meeting as provided in paragraph (b). 794 (b)âThe commission may hold a special meeting when it must 795 meet to conduct emergency business by giving 48 hoursâ notice to 796 all commissioners, on the commissionâs website, and by other 797 means as provided in the commissionâs rules. The commissionâs 798 legal counsel shall certify that the commissionâs need to meet 799 qualifies as an emergency. 800 (7)(a) The commission or the executive committee or other 801 committee of the commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic 802 meeting if the commission or the committee needs to receive 803 legal advice or discuss any of the following: 804 1.âNoncompliance of a member state with its obligations 805 under the compact. 806 2.âThe employment, compensation, or discipline of, or other 807 matters, practices, or procedures related to, specific 808 employees. 809 3.âCurrent or threatened discipline of a licensee by the 810 commission or by a member stateâs licensing authority. 811 4.âCurrent, threatened, or reasonably anticipated 812 litigation. 813 5.âNegotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or 814 sale of goods, services, or real estate. 815 6.âAccusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any 816 person. 817 7.âTrade secrets or commercial or financial information 818 that is privileged or confidential. 819 8.âInformation of a personal nature when disclosure would 820 constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy. 821 9.âInvestigative records compiled for law enforcement 822 purposes. 823 10.âInformation related to any investigative reports 824 prepared by, or on behalf of or for the use of, the commission 825 or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation 826 or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact. 827 11.âMatters specifically exempted from disclosure by 828 federal or member state law. 829 12.âOther matters as adopted by commission rule. 830 (b)âIf a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the 831 presiding officer must state that the meeting will be closed and 832 reference each relevant exempting provision, and such reference 833 must be recorded in the minutes. 834 (c)âThe commission shall keep minutes that fully and 835 clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall 836 provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the 837 reasons therefor, including a description of the views 838 expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action 839 must be identified in the minutes. All minutes and documents of 840 a closed meeting must remain under seal, subject to release only 841 by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of 842 competent jurisdiction. 843 (8)(a)âThe commission shall pay, or provide for the payment 844 of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, 845 and ongoing activities. 846 (b)âThe commission may accept any appropriate revenue 847 sources as provided in paragraph (3)(m). 848 (c)âThe commission may levy and collect an annual 849 assessment from each member state to cover the cost of the 850 operations and activities of the commission and its staff, which 851 must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget 852 as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other 853 sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for member 854 states shall be allocated based upon a formula that the 855 commission shall adopt by rule. 856 (d)âThe commission may not incur obligations of any kind 857 before securing the funds adequate to meet such obligations, and 858 the commission may not pledge the credit of any of the member 859 states, except by and with the authority of the member state. 860 (e)âThe commission shall keep accurate accounts of all 861 receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of 862 the commission are subject to the financial review and 863 accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all 864 receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission 865 are subject to an annual financial review by a certified or 866 licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial 867 review must be included in and become part of the annual report 868 of the commission. 869 (9)(a)âThe members, officers, executive director, 870 employees, and representatives of the commission are immune from 871 suit and liability, both personally and in their official 872 capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or 873 personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising 874 out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that 875 occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had 876 a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of 877 commission employment, duties, or responsibilities. This 878 paragraph does not protect any such person from suit or 879 liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by 880 the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. 881 The procurement of insurance of any type by the commission does 882 not compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder. 883 (b)âThe commission shall defend any member, officer, 884 executive director, employee, or representative of the 885 commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability 886 arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission 887 that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, 888 or responsibilities, or that the commission determines the 889 person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for 890 believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, 891 duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged 892 act, error, or omission did not result from that personâs 893 intentional or willful or wanton misconduct. This paragraph may 894 not be construed to prohibit such person from retaining his or 895 her own counsel at his or her own expense. 896 (c)âThe commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any 897 member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative 898 of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment 899 obtained against that person arising out of any actual or 900 alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope 901 of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or, as 902 determined by the commission, that the person against whom the 903 claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 904 within the scope of commission employment, duties, or 905 responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, 906 error, or omission did not result from the intentional or 907 willful or wanton misconduct of that person. 908 (d)âThis subsection may not be construed as a limitation on 909 the liability of any licensee for professional malpractice or 910 misconduct that is governed solely by any other applicable state 911 laws. 912 (e)âThe compact may not be interpreted to waive or 913 otherwise abrogate a member stateâs state action immunity or 914 state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust 915 claims under the Sherman Antitrust Act, Clayton Antitrust Act of 916 1914, or any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive 917 law or regulation. 918 (f)âThe compact may not be construed as a waiver of 919 sovereign immunity by the member states or by the commission. 920 921 ARTICLE XI 922 DATA SYSTEM 923 924 (1)âThe commission shall provide for the development, 925 maintenance, operation, and use of a coordinated data system. 926 (2)âThe commission shall assign each applicant for a 927 multistate license a unique identifier, as determined by the 928 rules of the commission. 929 (3)âNotwithstanding any other state law to the contrary, a 930 member state shall submit a uniform data set to the data system 931 on all individuals to whom the compact is applicable, as 932 required by the rules of the commission, including all of the 933 following information: 934 (a)âIdentifying information. 935 (b)âLicensure data. 936 (c)âAdverse actions against a license and related 937 information. 938 (d)âNonconfidential information related to alternative 939 program participation, the beginning and ending dates of such 940 participation, and other information related to such 941 participation not made confidential under member state law. 942 (e)âAny denial of application for licensure and the reason 943 for such denial. 944 (f)âAny current significant investigative information. 945 (g)âOther information that may facilitate the 946 administration of the compact or the protection of the public, 947 as determined by the rules of the commission. 948 (4)âThe records and information provided to a member state 949 under the compact or through the data system, when certified by 950 the commission or an agent thereof, constitute the authenticated 951 business records of the commission and are entitled to any 952 associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi 953 judicial, or administrative proceedings in a member state. 954 (5)(a)âCurrent significant investigative information 955 pertaining to a licensee in any member state may be made 956 available only to other member states. 957 (b)âIt is the responsibility of the member states to report 958 any adverse action against a licensee and to monitor the 959 database to determine whether adverse action has been taken 960 against a licensee in another member state. Adverse action 961 information pertaining to a licensee in any member state must be 962 made available to other member states. 963 (6)âMember states contributing information to the data 964 system may designate information that may not be shared with the 965 public without the express permission of the contributing state. 966 (7)âAny information submitted to the data system which is 967 subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the 968 member state contributing the information must be removed from 969 the data system. 970 971 ARTICLE XII 972 RULEMAKING 973 974 (1)âThe commission shall adopt rules to implement and 975 administer the compact. A rule is invalid and has no force or 976 effect if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule 977 is invalid because the commission exercised its rulemaking 978 authority in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of 979 the compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon 980 another applicable standard of review. 981 (2)âThe rules of the commission have the force of law in 982 each member state; however, if the rules of the commission 983 conflict with the laws, regulations, or applicable standards of 984 a member state governing the practice of social work as held by 985 a court of competent jurisdiction, the rules of the commission 986 are ineffective in that state to the extent of the conflict. 987 (3)âThe commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers 988 pursuant to the criteria set forth in this article and the rules 989 adopted hereunder. Rules become binding the day after they are 990 adopted or the date specified in the rule or amendment, 991 whichever is later. 992 (4)âIf a majority of the legislatures of the member states 993 rejects a rule or portion of a rule, by enactment of a statute 994 or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact 995 within 4 years after the date of adoption of the rule, such rule 996 has no further force and effect in any member state. 997 (5)âRules must be adopted at a regular or special meeting 998 of the commission. 999 (6)âBefore adoption of a proposed rule, the commission 1000 shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to provide oral 1001 and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments. 1002 (7)âBefore adoption of a proposed rule by the commission, 1003 and at least 30 days before the meeting at which the commission 1004 will hold a public hearing on the proposed rule, the commission 1005 shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking: 1006 (a)âOn the website of the commission or on another publicly 1007 accessible platform; 1008 (b)âTo persons who have requested notice of the 1009 commissionâs notices of proposed rulemaking; and 1010 (c)âIn any other manner as specified by commission rule. 1011 (8)âThe notice of proposed rulemaking must include all of 1012 the following: 1013 (a)âThe time, date, and location of the public hearing at 1014 which the commission will hear public comments on the proposed 1015 rule and, if different, the time, date, and location of the 1016 meeting where the commission will consider and vote on the 1017 proposed rule. 1018 (b)âIf the hearing is held through telecommunication, video 1019 conference, or other similar electronic means, the mechanism for 1020 accessing the hearing must be included in the notice of proposed 1021 rulemaking. 1022 (c)âThe text of the proposed rule and the reasons 1023 necessitating the rule. 1024 (d)âA request for comments on the proposed rule from any 1025 interested person. 1026 (e)âThe manner in which interested persons may submit 1027 written comments. 1028 (9)âAll hearings must be recorded. A copy of the recording 1029 and all written comments and documents received by the 1030 commission in response to the proposed rule must be made 1031 available to the public. 1032 (10)âThis article does not require a separate hearing on 1033 each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the 1034 commission at hearings required by this article. 1035 (11)âThe commission shall, by majority vote of all members, 1036 take final action on the proposed rule based on the rulemaking 1037 record and the full text of the rule. 1038 (a)âThe commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule 1039 if the changes do not expand the original purpose of the 1040 proposed rule. 1041 (b)âThe commission shall provide an explanation of the 1042 reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed rule as 1043 well as the reasons why substantive changes recommended by 1044 commenters were not made. 1045 (c)âThe commission shall set a reasonable effective date 1046 for each rule. Except for an emergency as provided in subsection 1047 (12), the effective date of the rule must be at least 30 days 1048 after the commission issues the notice of rule adoption or 1049 amendment. 1050 (12)âUpon determination that an emergency exists, the 1051 commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule with 48 1052 hoursâ notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the 1053 usual rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and in this 1054 article are retroactively applied to the rule as soon as 1055 reasonably possible, but in no event later than 90 days after 1056 the effective date of the rule. For purposes of this subsection, 1057 an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in 1058 order to: 1059 (a)âMeet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or 1060 welfare; 1061 (b)âPrevent a loss of commission or member state funds; 1062 (c)âMeet a deadline for the adoption of a rule which is 1063 established by federal law or rule; or 1064 (d)âProtect public health and safety. 1065 (13)âThe commission or an authorized committee of the 1066 commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule for 1067 purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, 1068 errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of 1069 any revision must be posted on the commissionâs website. The 1070 revision is subject to challenge by any person for a period of 1071 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on 1072 the grounds that the revision results in a material change to a 1073 rule. A challenge must be made in writing and delivered to the 1074 commission before the end of the notice period. If a challenge 1075 is not made, the revision will take effect without further 1076 action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take 1077 effect without the approval of the commission. 1078 (14)âA member stateâs rulemaking requirements do not apply 1079 under this compact. 1080 1081 ARTICLE XIII 1082 OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT 1083 1084 (1)(a)âThe executive and judicial branches of state 1085 government in each member state shall enforce the compact and 1086 take all actions necessary to implement the compact. 1087 (b)âExcept as otherwise provided in the compact, venue is 1088 proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission 1089 shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent 1090 jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is 1091 located. The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional 1092 defenses to the extent that it adopts or consents to participate 1093 in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. This paragraph 1094 does not affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in 1095 any action against a licensee for professional malpractice, 1096 misconduct, or any such similar matter. 1097 (c)âThe commission is entitled to receive service of 1098 process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or 1099 interpretation of the compact and has standing to intervene in 1100 such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the 1101 commission service of process renders a judgment or an order 1102 void as to the commission, the compact, or adopted rules. 1103 (2)(a)âIf the commission determines that a member state has 1104 defaulted in the performance of its obligations or 1105 responsibilities under the compact or the adopted rules, the 1106 commission must provide written notice to the defaulting state. 1107 The notice of default must describe the default, the proposed 1108 means of curing the default, and any other action that the 1109 commission may take, and must offer training and specific 1110 technical assistance regarding the default. 1111 (b)âThe commission shall provide a copy of the notice of 1112 default to the other member states. 1113 (c)âIf a state in default fails to cure the default, the 1114 defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon an 1115 affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the member 1116 states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred on 1117 that state by the compact may be terminated on the effective 1118 date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the 1119 offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during 1120 the period of default. 1121 (d)âTermination of membership in the compact may be imposed 1122 only after all other means of securing compliance have been 1123 exhausted. The commission shall give notice of intent to suspend 1124 or terminate to the Governor of the defaulting state, the 1125 majority and minority leaders of the defaulting stateâs 1126 legislature, the defaulting stateâs licensing authority, and the 1127 licensing authority of each member state. 1128 (e)âA state that has its membership terminated from the 1129 compact is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and 1130 liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, 1131 including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of 1132 termination. 1133 (f)âUpon the termination of a stateâs membership from the 1134 compact, that state shall immediately provide notice to all 1135 licensees within that state of such termination. The terminated 1136 state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted under the 1137 compact for at least 180 days after the date of the notice of 1138 termination. 1139 (g)âThe commission does not bear any costs related to a 1140 state that is found to be in default or that has been terminated 1141 from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the 1142 commission and the defaulting state. 1143 (h)âThe defaulting state may appeal the action of the 1144 commission by petitioning the United States District Court for 1145 the District of Columbia or the federal district where the 1146 commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall 1147 be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable 1148 attorney fees. 1149 (3)(a)âUpon request by a member state, the commission shall 1150 attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact which arise 1151 among member states and between member and nonmember states. 1152 (b)âThe commission shall adopt a rule providing for both 1153 mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as 1154 appropriate. 1155 (4)(a)âBy majority vote as provided by rule, the commission 1156 may initiate legal action against a member state in default in 1157 the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or 1158 the federal district where the commission has its principal 1159 offices to enforce compliance with the compact and its adopted 1160 rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and 1161 damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the 1162 prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, 1163 including reasonable attorney fees. The remedies herein are not 1164 the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may 1165 pursue any other remedies available under federal law or the 1166 defaulting member stateâs law. 1167 (b)âA member state may initiate legal action against the 1168 commission in the United States District Court for the District 1169 of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its 1170 principal offices to enforce compliance with the compact and its 1171 adopted rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive 1172 relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is 1173 necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of 1174 such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. 1175 (c)âOnly a member state may seek enforcement of the compact 1176 against the commission. 1177 1178 ARTICLE XIV 1179 EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT 1180 1181 (1)âThe compact becomes effective on the date the compact 1182 statute is enacted into law in the seventh member state. 1183 (2)(a)âOn or after the effective date of the compact, the 1184 commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the 1185 first seven charter member states to determine whether the 1186 statute enacted by each such charter member state is materially 1187 different from the model compact language. 1188 1.âA charter member state whose enactment is found to be 1189 materially different from the model compact language is entitled 1190 to the default process set forth in Article XIII. 1191 2.âIf any member state is later found to be in default or 1192 is terminated or withdraws from the compact, the commission 1193 remains in existence and the compact remains in effect even if 1194 the number of member states is less than seven. 1195 (b)âMember states enacting the compact after the seven 1196 initial charter member states are subject to the process set 1197 forth in paragraph (3)(u) of Article X to determine whether 1198 their enactments are materially different from the model compact 1199 language and whether they qualify for participation in the 1200 compact. 1201 (c)âAll actions taken for the benefit of the commission or 1202 in furtherance of administration of the compact before the 1203 effective date of the compact or the commission coming into 1204 existence are considered to be actions of the commission unless 1205 specifically repudiated by the commission. 1206 (d)âAny state that joins the compact subsequent to the 1207 commissionâs initial adoption of the rules and bylaws is subject 1208 to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the 1209 compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been 1210 previously adopted by the commission has the full force and 1211 effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state. 1212 (3)âAny member state may withdraw from the compact by 1213 enacting a statute repealing the compact. 1214 (a)âA member stateâs withdrawal does not take effect until 1215 180 days after enactment of the repealing statute. 1216 (b)âWithdrawal does not affect the continuing requirement 1217 of the withdrawing stateâs licensing authority to comply with 1218 the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of 1219 the compact before the effective date of withdrawal. 1220 (c)âUpon enactment of a statute repealing the compact, a 1221 state shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all 1222 licensees within that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent 1223 statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing state must 1224 continue to recognize all licenses granted under the compact for 1225 at least 180 days after the date of such notice of withdrawal. 1226 (4)âThe compact does not invalidate or prevent any 1227 licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a 1228 member state and a nonmember state which does not conflict with 1229 the compact. 1230 (5)âThe compact may be amended by the member states. An 1231 amendment to the compact does not become effective and binding 1232 on any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all 1233 member states. 1234 1235 ARTICLE XV 1236 CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY 1237 1238 (1)âThe compact and the commissionâs rulemaking authority 1239 shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, 1240 implementation, and administration of the compact. Provisions of 1241 the compact expressly authorizing or requiring the adoption of 1242 rules may not be construed to limit the commissionâs rulemaking 1243 authority solely for those purposes. 1244 (2)âThe provisions of the compact are severable, and, if 1245 any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of the compact is 1246 held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the 1247 constitution of any member state, of a state seeking 1248 participation in the compact, or of the United States, or the 1249 applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or 1250 circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of 1251 competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of the 1252 compact and the applicability thereof to any other government, 1253 agency, person, or circumstance is not affected. 1254 (3)âNotwithstanding subsection (2), the commission may deny 1255 a stateâs participation in the compact, or may terminate a 1256 member stateâs participation in the compact in accordance with 1257 the requirements of subsection (2) of Article XIII, if it 1258 determines that a constitutional requirement of a member state 1259 is a material departure from the compact. Otherwise, if the 1260 compact is held to be contrary to the constitution of any member 1261 state, the compact remains in full force and effect as to the 1262 remaining member states and in full force and effect as to the 1263 member state affected as to all severable matters. 1264 1265 ARTICLE XVI 1266 CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS 1267 1268 (1)âA licensee providing services in a remote state under a 1269 multistate authorization to practice shall adhere to the laws 1270 and regulations, including applicable standards, of the remote 1271 state where the client is located at the time care is rendered. 1272 (2)âThe compact does not prevent or inhibit the enforcement 1273 of any other law of a member state which is not inconsistent 1274 with the compact. 1275 (3)âAny law, statute, regulation, or other legal 1276 requirement in a member state in conflict with the compact are 1277 superseded to the extent of the conflict. 1278 (4)âAll permissible agreements between the commission and 1279 the member states are binding in accordance with their terms. 1280 Section 2.âParagraph (b) of subsection (10) of section 1281 456.073, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1282 456.073âDisciplinary proceedings.âDisciplinary proceedings 1283 for each board shall be within the jurisdiction of the 1284 department. 1285 (10) 1286 (b)âThe department shall report any significant 1287 investigation information relating to a nurse holding a 1288 multistate license to the coordinated licensure information 1289 system pursuant to s. 464.0095; any investigative information 1290 relating to an audiologist or a speech-language pathologist 1291 holding a compact privilege under the Audiology and Speech 1292 Language Pathology Interstate Compact to the data system 1293 pursuant to s. 468.1335; any investigative information relating 1294 to a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant holding 1295 a compact privilege under the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact 1296 to the data system pursuant to s. 486.112; any significant 1297 investigatory information relating to a psychologist practicing 1298 under the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact to the 1299 coordinated licensure information system pursuant to s. 1300 490.0075; and any significant investigatory information relating 1301 to a health care practitioner practicing under the Professional 1302 Counselors Licensure Compact to the data system pursuant to s. 1303 491.017; and any significant investigative information relating 1304 to a clinical social worker practicing under the Social Work 1305 Licensure Interstate Compact to the data system pursuant to s. 1306 491.022. 1307 Section 3.âSubsection (5) of section 456.076, Florida 1308 Statutes, is amended to read: 1309 456.076âImpaired practitioner programs.â 1310 (5)âA consultant shall enter into a participant contract 1311 with an impaired practitioner and shall establish the terms of 1312 monitoring and shall include the terms in a participant 1313 contract. In establishing the terms of monitoring, the 1314 consultant may consider the recommendations of one or more 1315 approved evaluators, treatment programs, or treatment providers. 1316 A consultant may modify the terms of monitoring if the 1317 consultant concludes, through the course of monitoring, that 1318 extended, additional, or amended terms of monitoring are 1319 required for the protection of the health, safety, and welfare 1320 of the public. If the impaired practitioner is an audiologist or 1321 a speech-language pathologist practicing under the Audiology and 1322 Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact pursuant to s. 1323 468.1335, a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant 1324 practicing under the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact pursuant 1325 to s. 486.112, a psychologist practicing under the Psychology 1326 Interjurisdictional Compact pursuant to s. 490.0075, or a health 1327 care practitioner practicing under the Professional Counselors 1328 Licensure Compact pursuant to s. 491.017, or a clinical social 1329 worker practicing under the Social Work Licensure Interstate 1330 Compact pursuant to s. 491.022, the terms of the monitoring 1331 contract must include the impaired practitionerâs withdrawal 1332 from all practice under the compact unless authorized by a 1333 member state. 1334 Section 4.âSubsection (9) is added to section 491.004, 1335 Florida Statutes, to read: 1336 491.004âBoard of Clinical Social Work, Marriage and Family 1337 Therapy, and Mental Health Counseling.â 1338 (9)âThe board shall appoint an individual to serve as the 1339 stateâs delegate on the Social Work Licensure Compact 1340 Commission, as required under s. 491.022. 1341 Section 5.âSubsection (6) of section 491.005, Florida 1342 Statutes, is amended to read: 1343 491.005âLicensure by examination.â 1344 (6)âEXEMPTIONS EXEMPTION.â 1345 (a)âA person licensed as a clinical social worker, marriage 1346 and family therapist, or mental health counselor in another 1347 state who is practicing under the Professional Counselors 1348 Licensure Compact pursuant to s. 491.017, and only within the 1349 scope provided therein, is exempt from the licensure 1350 requirements of this section, as applicable. 1351 (b)âA person licensed as a clinical social worker in 1352 another state who is practicing under the Social Work Licensure 1353 Interstate Compact pursuant to s. 491.022, and only within the 1354 scope provided therein, is exempt from the licensure 1355 requirements of this section, as applicable. 1356 Section 6.âSubsection (4) is added to section 491.006, 1357 Florida Statutes, to read: 1358 491.006âLicensure or certification by endorsement.â 1359 (4)âA person licensed as a clinical social worker in 1360 another state who is practicing under the Social Work Licensure 1361 Interstate Compact pursuant to s. 491.022, and only within the 1362 scope provided therein, is exempt from the licensure 1363 requirements of this section, as applicable. 1364 Section 7.âSection 491.009, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1365 read: 1366 491.009âDiscipline.â 1367 (1)âThe following acts constitute grounds for denial of a 1368 license or disciplinary action, as specified in s. 456.072(2), 1369 or s. 491.017, or s. 491.022: 1370 (a)âAttempting to obtain, obtaining, or renewing a license, 1371 registration, or certificate under this chapter by bribery or 1372 fraudulent misrepresentation or through an error of the board or 1373 the department. 1374 (b)âHaving a license, registration, or certificate to 1375 practice a comparable profession revoked, suspended, or 1376 otherwise acted against, including the denial of certification 1377 or licensure by another state, territory, or country. 1378 (c)âBeing convicted or found guilty of, regardless of 1379 adjudication, or having entered a plea of nolo contendere to, a 1380 crime in any jurisdiction which directly relates to the practice 1381 of his or her profession or the ability to practice his or her 1382 profession. However, in the case of a plea of nolo contendere, 1383 the board shall allow the person who is the subject of the 1384 disciplinary proceeding to present evidence in mitigation 1385 relevant to the underlying charges and circumstances surrounding 1386 the plea. 1387 (d)âFalse, deceptive, or misleading advertising or 1388 obtaining a fee or other thing of value on the representation 1389 that beneficial results from any treatment will be guaranteed. 1390 (e)âAdvertising, practicing, or attempting to practice 1391 under a name other than oneâs own. 1392 (f)âMaintaining a professional association with any person 1393 who the applicant, licensee, registered intern, or 1394 certificateholder knows, or has reason to believe, is in 1395 violation of this chapter or of a rule of the department or the 1396 board. 1397 (g)âKnowingly aiding, assisting, procuring, or advising any 1398 nonlicensed, nonregistered, or noncertified person to hold 1399 himself or herself out as licensed, registered, or certified 1400 under this chapter. 1401 (h)âFailing to perform any statutory or legal obligation 1402 placed upon a person licensed, registered, or certified under 1403 this chapter. 1404 (i)âWillfully making or filing a false report or record; 1405 failing to file a report or record required by state or federal 1406 law; willfully impeding or obstructing the filing of a report or 1407 record; or inducing another person to make or file a false 1408 report or record or to impede or obstruct the filing of a report 1409 or record. Such report or record includes only a report or 1410 record which requires the signature of a person licensed, 1411 registered, or certified under this chapter. 1412 (j)âPaying a kickback, rebate, bonus, or other remuneration 1413 for receiving a patient or client, or receiving a kickback, 1414 rebate, bonus, or other remuneration for referring a patient or 1415 client to another provider of mental health care services or to 1416 a provider of health care services or goods; referring a patient 1417 or client to oneself for services on a fee-paid basis when those 1418 services are already being paid for by some other public or 1419 private entity; or entering into a reciprocal referral 1420 agreement. 1421 (k)âCommitting any act upon a patient or client which would 1422 constitute sexual battery or which would constitute sexual 1423 misconduct as defined pursuant to s. 491.0111. 1424 (l)âMaking misleading, deceptive, untrue, or fraudulent 1425 representations in the practice of any profession licensed, 1426 registered, or certified under this chapter. 1427 (m)âSoliciting patients or clients personally, or through 1428 an agent, through the use of fraud, intimidation, undue 1429 influence, or a form of overreaching or vexatious conduct. 1430 (n)âFailing to make available to a patient or client, upon 1431 written request, copies of tests, reports, or documents in the 1432 possession or under the control of the licensee, registered 1433 intern, or certificateholder which have been prepared for and 1434 paid for by the patient or client. 1435 (o)âFailing to respond within 30 days to a written 1436 communication from the department or the board concerning any 1437 investigation by the department or the board, or failing to make 1438 available any relevant records with respect to any investigation 1439 about the licenseeâs, registered internâs, or 1440 certificateholderâs conduct or background. 1441 (p)âBeing unable to practice the profession for which he or 1442 she is licensed, registered, or certified under this chapter 1443 with reasonable skill or competence as a result of any mental or 1444 physical condition or by reason of illness; drunkenness; or 1445 excessive use of drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other 1446 substance. In enforcing this paragraph, upon a finding by the 1447 State Surgeon General, the State Surgeon Generalâs designee, or 1448 the board that probable cause exists to believe that the 1449 licensee, registered intern, or certificateholder is unable to 1450 practice the profession because of the reasons stated in this 1451 paragraph, the department shall have the authority to compel a 1452 licensee, registered intern, or certificateholder to submit to a 1453 mental or physical examination by psychologists, physicians, or 1454 other licensees under this chapter, designated by the department 1455 or board. If the licensee, registered intern, or 1456 certificateholder refuses to comply with such order, the 1457 departmentâs order directing the examination may be enforced by 1458 filing a petition for enforcement in the circuit court in the 1459 circuit in which the licensee, registered intern, or 1460 certificateholder resides or does business. The licensee, 1461 registered intern, or certificateholder against whom the 1462 petition is filed may not be named or identified by initials in 1463 any public court records or documents, and the proceedings shall 1464 be closed to the public. The department shall be entitled to the 1465 summary procedure provided in s. 51.011. A licensee, registered 1466 intern, or certificateholder affected under this paragraph shall 1467 at reasonable intervals be afforded an opportunity to 1468 demonstrate that he or she can resume the competent practice for 1469 which he or she is licensed, registered, or certified with 1470 reasonable skill and safety to patients. 1471 (q)âPerforming any treatment or prescribing any therapy 1472 which, by the prevailing standards of the mental health 1473 professions in the community, would constitute experimentation 1474 on human subjects, without first obtaining full, informed, and 1475 written consent. 1476 (r)âFailing to meet the minimum standards of performance in 1477 professional activities when measured against generally 1478 prevailing peer performance, including the undertaking of 1479 activities for which the licensee, registered intern, or 1480 certificateholder is not qualified by training or experience. 1481 (s)âDelegating professional responsibilities to a person 1482 who the licensee, registered intern, or certificateholder knows 1483 or has reason to know is not qualified by training or experience 1484 to perform such responsibilities. 1485 (t)âViolating a rule relating to the regulation of the 1486 profession or a lawful order of the department or the board 1487 previously entered in a disciplinary hearing. 1488 (u)âFailure of the licensee, registered intern, or 1489 certificateholder to maintain in confidence a communication made 1490 by a patient or client in the context of such services, except 1491 as provided in s. 491.0147. 1492 (v)âMaking public statements which are derived from test 1493 data, client contacts, or behavioral research and which identify 1494 or damage research subjects or clients. 1495 (w)âViolating any provision of this chapter or chapter 456, 1496 or any rules adopted pursuant thereto. 1497 (2)(a)âThe board or, in the case of certified master social 1498 workers, the department may enter an order denying licensure or 1499 imposing any of the penalties authorized in s. 456.072(2) 1500 against any applicant for licensure or any licensee who violates 1501 subsection (1) or s. 456.072(1). 1502 (b)âThe board may take adverse action against a clinical 1503 social workerâs, a marriage and family therapistâs, or a mental 1504 health counselorâs privilege to practice under the Professional 1505 Counselors Licensure Compact pursuant to s. 491.017 and may 1506 impose any of the penalties in s. 456.072(2) if the clinical 1507 social worker, marriage and family therapist, or mental health 1508 counselor commits an act specified in subsection (1) or s. 1509 456.072(1). 1510 (c)âThe board may take adverse action against a social 1511 workerâs multistate authorization to practice under the Social 1512 Work Licensure Compact pursuant to s. 491.022 and may impose any 1513 of the penalties in s. 456.072(2) if the social worker commits 1514 an act specified in subsection (1) or s. 456.072(1). 1515 Section 8.âParagraph (m) is added to subsection (10) of 1516 section 768.28, Florida Statutes, to read: 1517 768.28âWaiver of sovereign immunity in tort actions; 1518 recovery limits; civil liability for damages caused during a 1519 riot; limitation on attorney fees; statute of limitations; 1520 exclusions; indemnification; risk management programs.â 1521 (10) 1522 (m)âFor purposes of this section, the individual appointed 1523 under s. 491.004(9) as the stateâs delegate on the Social Work 1524 Licensure Compact Commission, when serving in that capacity 1525 pursuant to s. 491.022, and any administrator, officer, 1526 executive director, employee, or representative of the 1527 commission, when acting within the scope of his or her 1528 employment, duties, or responsibilities in this state, is 1529 considered an agent of the state. The commission shall pay any 1530 claim or judgment pursuant to this section and may maintain 1531 insurance coverage to pay any such claim or judgment. 1532 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.